Utah statutes.
75-7-506.   Overdue distribution.
Whether or not a trust contains a spendthrift provision, a creditor or
assignee of a beneficiary may reach a mandatory distribution of income or
principal, including a distribution upon termination of the trust, if the
trustee has not made the distribution to the beneficiary within a reasonable
time after the required distribution date.
